Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Chapter 15. Financial Provisions.

Cross references. —

For definitions and penalties applicable to this chapter, see AS

19.59.001

and

19.59.002

.

Sec. 19.15.010.
Loans to department.

For the purpose of participating in a federal grant-in-aid program, the department may apply to the Department of Administration for short-term loans from the general fund for periods not to exceed nine months and for amounts estimated not to exceed anticipated revenue for the term of the loan. The Department of Administration may approve the loan if it determines that the loan would not adversely curtail other expenditures from the general fund.

History.

(§ 2 art VI title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets and Bridges, §§ 130 — 139.

40 C.J.S., Highways, § 155 et seq.

Sec. 19.15.020.
Assent to federal aid; line of credit.

The legislature assents to the Act of Congress approved July 11, 1916 (39 Stat. 355) entitled, “An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in the construction of rural post roads, and for other purposes.” The department may make all contracts and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government in the construction of highways under the provisions of that Act, and all Acts amending or supplementing it, and any other Act of Congress that may be enacted, including the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1956 (Public Law 627, 85th Congress, 2nd Session).

The department may incur a line of credit or indebtedness to the Federal Highway Administration, United States Department of Transportation, under 23 U.S.C. 601 — 609 (Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 1998), as amended, and may enter into a contract or agreement with any public or private person, governmental unit or agency, corporation, or other business entity to secure the indebtedness.

History.

(§ 1 art II title II ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (b).

Sec. 19.15.025.
Federal-aid highway projects.

The department may allocate up to two percent of nonrestricted federal-aid highway apportionments to projects classified under the trails and recreational access for Alaska program under a statewide transportation improvement program.

The department shall annually allocate at least 39 percent of nonrestricted federal-aid highway apportionments to projects classified under the community transportation program under a statewide transportation improvement program.

Not more than 10 percent of the funds provided to a municipality for participation in federal-aid highway or other eligible projects may be expended from the transportation enhancement apportionment over the life of a transportation improvement program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 135 SLA 2003; am §§ 25, 26 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 17 AAC 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (a), substituted “The” for “Before October 1, 2006, the department may annually allocate up to four percent of nonrestricted federal-aid highway apportionments to projects classified under the trails and recreational access for Alaska program under a statewide transportation improvement program. On or after October 1, 2006, the”; in (b), substituted “The” for “Before October 1, 2006, the department shall annually allocate at least 37 percent of nonrestricted federal-aid highway apportionments to projects classified under the community transportation program under a statewide transportation improvement program. On or after October 1, 2006, the”.

Sec. 19.15.030.
Participation by municipality in federal highway construction.

When a federal-aid highway is routed through a municipality, it may participate in the financing, planning, construction, acquisition of right-of-way, and maintenance of the highway in the manner and proportion the department determines is reasonable and proper.

History.

(§ 2 art II title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Cross references. —

For provisions allowing for local control of state transportation corridors, see AS

19.20.015

.

Sec. 19.15.040.
General laws governing assessments by municipalities to pay highway costs.

The provisions of law relating to the levying of assessments for highway financing, planning, construction, acquisition of right-of-way, and maintenance, referred to in AS

19.15.030

apply to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the general purpose of AS 19.05 — AS 19.25.

History.

(§ 3 art II title II ch 152 SLA 1957)